Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
ABANDONMENT - TOWNS

31-3-201. Procedure for determination of abandonment.

When any town has failed, for a period of five years or longer immediately prior to the filing of the application under this section, to hold any regular or special election or to elect officers and to maintain any town government, such town may be determined to be abandoned as follows:

The county attorney of the county in which the town is located or any owner of land in such town may make application to the secretary of state to determine that the town is abandoned.

The secretary of state shall forthwith cause notice of the filing of such application to be published once in some newspaper of general circulation in the county and, where possible, to be posted in at least two conspicuous locations within the town. The notice shall specify the date, time, and place where said application will be heard, which date shall be not less than twenty days after the date of such publication.

The secretary of state shall hear such application and, after receiving evidence thereon, shall determine whether or not said town has been abandoned. If he determines that the town is abandoned, a copy of such determination shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which said town was located. Thereupon, said town shall cease to exist.

The books, documents, records, papers, and corporate seal of any town so abandoned shall be deposited with the county clerk and recorder of the county within which the town or any part thereof is located, for safekeeping and reference in the future.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1022, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-9-201 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-3-202. Consequences of determination.

After such determination, all existing streets, avenues, and alleys previously located within an abandoned town shall be vested in the board of county commissioners of the county in which said town was located. The board of county commissioners may thereafter vacate any such streets, avenues, or alleys pursuant to part 3 of article 2 of title 43, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 31-3-201, any debt or other obligations of such town outstanding at the time of such determination of abandonment shall not be abrogated, nor shall any requirement be abrogated or avoided that has been imposed upon such town by the environmental protection agency, by any court, or by any other instrumentality of the state or federal government. The town shall continue in existence solely for the purpose of satisfying such outstanding debt or other obligations or other requirements, and the powers and duties of the governing body of the town and its officers shall be performed by the board of county commissioners and the county officers in such levy and collection of taxes or the imposition and collection of such fees, rates, and charges as may be required to satisfy the outstanding debt or other obligations or other requirements in accordance with their terms.

Except as to streets, avenues, alleys, or reversionary interests, the right, title, and interest to all real property and the improvements thereon owned by any such town shall be vested in the county in which such property is situate, subject to any easements or rights-of-way then in use.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1023, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-9-202 as it existed prior to 1975.